Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Rulemaking and Publications
4-5-222. Record of voting on policy or rule adoption.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in addition to other rulemaking requirements imposed by law, each agency shall maintain the following written records on each rule adopted by such agency:

The rule, in writing, signed by the person proposing such rule;

A roll call vote on adoption by “aye” or “no” of each person voting; and

The responses of the agency to the comments submitted at any public hearing on the proposed rule. Each comment shall be addressed; provided, however, that similar comments may be grouped together and addressed in one (1) response. The response to specific comments shall include the reasons for agency adoption or rejection of any specific changes suggested by the comments. A transcript of the rulemaking hearing shall not suffice as the response to comments required by this section.

The record required by this section need not be published, but a copy shall be filed with the secretary of state, and the agency shall certify its compliance with this section to the attorney general and reporter prior to the approval of the rule. Failure to file such record at the time the rule is filed with the secretary of state will make the rule void and of no effect. Such record shall be available to the public during normal office hours of the agency at its principal office or the office of the secretary of state.

Whenever policies that affect the rules and procedures of any agency are decided by vote of the agency, a record on such policies shall be maintained in accordance with this section and made available to the public in the same manner as is required for a rule.

Acts 1977, ch. 187, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 4-536, 4-5-130; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 32; 1991, ch. 346, § 5; 1993, ch. 458, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

4-5-223. Declaratory orders.

Any affected person may petition an agency for a declaratory order as to the validity or applicability of a statute, rule or order within the primary jurisdiction of the agency. The agency shall:

Convene a contested case hearing pursuant to this chapter and issue a declaratory order, which shall be subject to review in the chancery court of Davidson County, unless otherwise specifically provided by statute, in the manner provided for the review of decisions in contested cases; or

Refuse to issue a declaratory order, in which event the person petitioning the agency for a declaratory order may apply for a declaratory judgment as provided in § 4-5-225.

A declaratory order shall be binding between the agency and parties on the state of facts alleged in the petition unless it is altered or set aside by the agency or a court in a proper proceeding.

If an agency has not set a petition for a declaratory order for a contested case hearing within sixty (60) days after receipt of the petition, the agency shall be deemed to have denied the petition and to have refused to issue a declaratory order.

Each agency shall prescribe by rule the form of such petitions and the procedure for their submission, consideration and disposition.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 34.

Attorney General Opinions. The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act does not apply to the Knoxville-Knox county community action committee, OAG 05-148 (9/29/05), 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 150.

4-5-224. Declaratory order request — Notices.

Whenever an agency is petitioned for a declaratory order, that agency shall:

Submit electronically to the secretary of state the notice of hearing for publication in the notice section of the administrative register website and, if a statute applicable to the specific agency or a specific rule or class of rules under consideration requires some other form of publication, publish notice as required by that statute in addition to publication in the notice section of the administrative register website; and

Take such other steps as it deems necessary to convey effective notice to other agencies and professional associations that are likely to have an interest in the declaratory order proceedings.

Such notices shall include specific information relating to the declaratory order request, including, but not limited to:

Name of petitioner and an explanation of whom such person or entity purports to represent;

A summary of the relief requested, including the specific nature of the requested order, and the conclusion or conclusions the petitioner requests that the agency reach following the declaratory proceeding; and

A detailed outline and summary of the statutes or regulations that the agency is called upon to interpret or upon which it is to rule.

Notwithstanding § 4-5-223(a)-(c), except in the case of an emergency proceeding that meets the conditions of § 4-5-208, no declaratory order proceeding that calls for a title 63 agency to rule on the meaning of any provision of a licensee's professional licensing act may be set until at least forty-five (45) days after the notice required by this section has been filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1997, ch. 162, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, §§ 17, 18.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-5-224, concerning declaratory judgments, was transferred to §4-5-225 pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 162, § 1.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-225. Declaratory judgments.

The legal validity or applicability of a statute, rule or order of an agency to specified circumstances may be determined in a suit for a declaratory judgment in the chancery court of Davidson County, unless otherwise specifically provided by statute, if the court finds that the statute, rule or order, or its threatened application, interferes with or impairs, or threatens to interfere with or impair, the legal rights or privileges of the complainant. The agency shall be made a party to the suit.

A declaratory judgment shall not be rendered concerning the validity or applicability of a statute, rule or order unless the complainant has petitioned the agency for a declaratory order and the agency has refused to issue a declaratory order.

In passing on the legal validity of a rule or order, the court shall declare the rule or order invalid only if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions, exceeds the statutory authority of the agency, was adopted without compliance with the rulemaking procedures provided for in this chapter or otherwise violates state or federal law.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 35; 1997, ch. 162, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-224.

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-5-225, concerning expiration of rules, was transferred to §4-5-226 pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 162, § 1.